Maryland, session 2025, HB0989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0989*

HOUSE BILL 989
(i) “License” means a license issued by the Department under this subtitle to
operate a food establishment.
21–309.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ON–FARM HOME PROCESSING LICENSE” MEANS A
LICENSE ISSUED TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OWNS A FARM TO PROCESS FOOD IN A
HOME OR DOMESTIC KITCHEN LOCATED ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S FARM.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT LIMIT THE AMOUNT OF REVENUE THE
HOLDER OF AN ON–FARM HOME PROCESSING LICENSE MAY DERIVE FROM FOOD
PROCESSED UNDER THE LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before October 1, 2025,
the Maryland Department of Health shall update COMAR 10.15.04.15 to repeal the
$40,000 limit on sales of food processed under an on–farm home processing license.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.